test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-uaddid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - tuáijiđ: # not checked
  
    tuáijiđ+V+Inf: tuáijiđ
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: tooijuđ
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toijuum
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: toijuuh
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáijoo
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tuáijojeen
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: toijuuvettee
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: toijuv
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: toijup
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: toijuuvetteđ
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuáijojeh
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tuáijojim
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tuáijojih
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: toijui
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: toijuim
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: toijuid
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: toijuin
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: toijuim
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: toijuid
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuáijojii
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: toijuuččim
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: toijuuččih
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: toijuuččij
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: toijuuččáim
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: toijuuččáid
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: toijuuččáin
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: toijuuččijm
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: toijuuččijd
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: toijuuččii
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tuáijuužeem
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: tuáijuužeeh
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tuájuš
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tuáijuužeen
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: tuájušvettee
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tuáijuužává
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tuáijuužep
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: tuájušvetteđ
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tuáijuužeh
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toijuu
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: toijum
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: tuáijuuččii
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tuáijuužii
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: xxxx
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: toijum
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: toijum
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: tuáijuumin
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: tuáijuumist
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: tuáijuumân
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: xxxx
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: tuáijuuhánnáá
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájâdâm
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tuájâdah
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuájâd
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tuájâdeen
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tuájâdvettee
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tuájâdává
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuájâdeh
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tuájâd
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tuájâdim
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuájâdij
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuájâdii
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tuájâdiččim
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tuájâdičij
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tuájâdižžeem
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tuájâdiš
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tuájâd
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tuájâdâm
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tuájâdižžii
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: tuájâdâm
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: tuájâdhánnáá
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: tuájâdem
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: tuájâdmân
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: tuájâdmin
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: tuájâdmist
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: tuájâddijn
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: tuájâddijnân
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: tuájâddijnâd
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: tuájâddijnis
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: tuáijiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger	+?
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájistâm
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájittâm
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájiškuáđám
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájâlâm
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáijâl
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tuájâleen
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuájâleh
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tuáijâl
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tuájâlim
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuájâlij
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuájâlii


  Verb - uáđđiđ: # not checked

    uáđđiđ+V+Inf: uáđđiđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: oođđuđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ođđuum
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ođđuuh
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáđđoo
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáđđojeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ođđuuvettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ođđuv
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ođđup
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ođđuuvetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáđđojeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uáđđojim
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uáđđojih
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ođđui
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ođđuim
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ođđuid
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ođđuin
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ođđuim
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ođđuid
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uáđđojii
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ođđuuččim
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: ođđuuččih
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ođđuuččij
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: ođđuuččáim
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: ođđuuččáid
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: ođđuuččáin
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: ođđuuččijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: ođđuuččijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: ođđuuččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: uáđđuužeem
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: uáđđuužeeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: uáđuš
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: uáđđuužeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: uáđušvettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: uáđđuužává
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: uáđđuužep
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: uáđušvetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: uáđđuužeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ođđuu
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ođđum
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: uáđđuuččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: uáđđuužii
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: ođđum
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: ođđum
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: uáđđuumin
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: uáđđuumist
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: uáđđuumân
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: uáđđuuhánnáá
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáđâlâm
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáđđâl
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáđâleen
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáđâleh
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uáđđâl
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uáđâlim
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uáđâlij
    uáđđiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uáđâlii
